Washington statutes.
RCW 10.29.070

Rules.

The supreme court shall develop and adopt rules to govern the procedures of a statewide special inquiry judge proceeding including rules assuring the confidentiality of all proceedings, testimony, and the identity of persons called as witnesses. The adoption of such rules shall be subject to the approval of such rules by the senate and house judiciary committees.

[ 1980 c 146 s 7.]